District of Columbia statutes.
31-2991

Closed claim analysis.

(a)

Within 180 days of march 14, 2007, the Mayor shall submit legislation to the Council for the establishment of a database of closed obstetrician/gynecologist malpractice claims reports to be submitted by providers of medical malpractice insurance.

(b)

The legislation shall include a plan which shall:

(A)

Contain provisions to identify trends and develop recommendations for preventative action for adverse Obstetrician/Gynecologist events;

(B)

Ensure dissemination of best practices among Obstetrician/Gynecologist practitioners and facilities and shall include provisions for ensuring the implementation of these practices; and

(C)

Include provisions to study recommendations based on closed Obstetrician/Gynecologist malpractice claims in other jurisdictions.

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-263, § 402, 54 DCR 807